North Dakota statutes. TITLE 36 Livestock
CHAPTER 36-04 Livestock Dealers [Repealed]

[Repealed by S.L. 2013, ch. 72, § 8]

Effective Date.

The repeal of this chapter by section 8 of chapter 72, S.L. 2013 became effective July 1, 2013.

Note.

See now N.D.C.C. ch. 4.1-83, Livestock Dealers.

36-04-01.
Definitions. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2013, ch. 72, § 8.

36-04-02.
Restrictions on application of provisions of chapter. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2013, ch. 72, § 8.

36-04-03.
Dealer’s license required — Agent designation and licensure — Suitability for licensure — Liability of owner for agent’s acts. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2013, ch. 72, § 8.

36-04-04.
Application for license — Contents — Refusal to license — Suspension and revocation. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2013, ch. 72, § 8.

36-04-05.
Dealer to file bond with department — Additional bond may be required. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2013, ch. 72, § 8.

36-04-05.1.
Records release required with application for licensure. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2013, ch. 72, § 8.

36-04-06.
Amount of bonds. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1973, ch. 275, § 18.

36-04-07.
Issuance of licenses — Fees — Term of license — Licenses not transferable. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2013, ch. 72, § 8.

36-04-07.1.
Notice — Nonsufficient funds checks. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2013, ch. 72, § 8.

36-04-08.
Transportation company or common carrier not to receive livestock or poultry for shipment from unlicensed dealer. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1973, ch. 275, § 18.

36-04-09.
Disposition of fees — Inspections. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2013, ch. 72, § 8.

36-04-09.1.
Cease and desist authority. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2013, ch. 72, § 8.

36-04-09.2.
Investigation of dealers — Hearing conducted to determine whether license should be issued or revoked. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2013, ch. 72, § 8.

36-04-10.
Refusal or revocation of license. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2013, ch. 72, § 8.

36-04-10.1.
Unlawful acts. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2013, ch. 72, § 8.

36-04-11.
Hearing had before license revoked — Regulations governing — Appeal from order. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2013, ch. 72, § 8.

36-04-11.1.
Rules and regulations. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2013, ch. 72, § 8.

36-04-12.
Department to become trustee upon default in dealer’s bond. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2013, ch. 72, § 8.

36-04-13.
Application by department for appointment of trustee — Hearing — Appointment. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2013, ch. 72, § 8.

36-04-14.
Department to take possession of records and property as trustee — Notice to file claims — When claims barred. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2013, ch. 72, § 8.

36-04-15.
Maintenance of actions to marshall assets of insolvent dealer. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2013, ch. 72, § 8.

36-04-16.
Remedy of claimants — Separate action by claimant permissible. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2013, ch. 72, § 8.

36-04-17.
Appeal or compromising of action by the department. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2013, ch. 72, § 8.

36-04-18.
Moneys collected on claims to be deposited in Bank of North Dakota. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2013, ch. 72, § 8.

36-04-19.
Department to file report upon recovery of trust fund — Notice to claimants — Approving or modifying report. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2013, ch. 72, § 8.

36-04-20.
Attorney general to represent department and may employ assistants — Department need not pay court costs. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2013, ch. 72, § 8.

36-04-21.
Penalties — Criminal — Civil — Injunctions. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2013, ch. 72, § 8.